Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MINNETONKA; THE MARSH.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $15,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Minnetonka to acquire property and to predesign, design, construct, and equip improvements at The Marsh. This appropriation includes money for improvements necessary to renovate the facility, including interior construction with ADA accessibility upgrades, energy efficient mechanical systems, and safety design for users of the facility. This appropriation also includes money for exterior improvements including structural repairs and for natural resource site improvements to protect and enhance the environment. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $15,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end